Idaho, session 2026, H0941.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5202. OFFICE OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE RULES COORDINATOR. (1) There is
hereby established the office of the administrative rules coordinator in the
division of financial management legislative services office. The coordi-
nator shall be a nonclassified employee and shall be appointed by and serve
at the pleasure of the administrator of the division of financial management
director of the legislative services office. All other employees of the of-
fice of the administrative rules coordinator shall be nonclassified posi-
tions, and any persons employed to fill positions in the office of the admin-
istrative rules coordinator thereafter shall be exempt from the provisions
of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.
(2) The coordinator shall have the authority to make clerical revisions
or to correct manifest typographical or grammatical errors to both proposed
and existing rules that do not alter the sense, meaning or effect of such
rules changes to both proposed and existing rules prior to publication in the
administrative bulletin pursuant to section 67-5203, Idaho Code.
(3) The coordinator shall receive all notices and rules required in
this chapter to be published in the bulletin or the administrative code.
The coordinator shall prescribe a uniform style, form, and numbering system
which shall apply to all rules adopted by all agencies. The coordinator
shall review all submitted rules for style, form, and numbering and may re-
turn a rule that is not in proper style, form, or number.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-5292, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.